Tennessee statutes. Title 43 Agriculture And Horticulture
Part 5

Membership

43-38-501. Amount and division of membership of interests — Selling and transferring interests — Purchasing interests — Dissent.

The authorized amount and divisions of patron membership interests and nonpatron membership interests may be increased or decreased or established or altered, in accordance with the restrictions in this chapter by amending the articles at a regular members' meeting or at a special members' meeting called for the purpose of the amendment.

Authorized membership interests may be issued pursuant to contribution agreements containing the terms and conditions prescribed in the articles or bylaws, or if authorized in the articles or bylaws as determined by the board. The cooperative shall disclose to any person or entity acquiring membership interests to be issued by the cooperative, the organization, capital structure and known business prospects and risks of the cooperative, the nature of the governance and financial rights of the membership interest being acquired and of other classes of membership and membership interests. The cooperative shall notify all members of the membership interests being offered by the cooperative. A membership interest may not be issued until the subscription price of the membership interest has been paid for in cash or a cash equivalent or property with the value of the property to be contributed approved by the board.

The patron membership interests collectively shall have not less than fifteen percent (15%) of the cooperative's financial rights to profit allocations and distributions.

After issuance by the cooperative, membership interests in a cooperative may only be sold or transferred in accordance with §§ 43-38-504 and 43-38-505, in each instance, with the approval of the board.

The cooperative may solicit and issue nonpatron membership interests on terms and conditions determined by the board and disclosed in the articles, bylaws or by separate disclosure to the members. Each member acquiring nonpatron membership interests shall sign a member control agreement or agree to the conditions of the bylaws, either of which shall describe the rights and obligations of the member as it relates to the nonpatron membership interests, the financial and governance rights, the transferability of the nonpatron membership interests, the division and allocations of profits and losses among the membership interests and membership classes, and financial rights upon liquidation. If the bylaws do not otherwise provide for the allocation of the profits and losses between patron membership interests and nonpatron membership interests, then the allocation of profits and losses among nonpatron membership interests individually and patron membership interests collectively shall be allocated on the basis of the value of contributions to capital made according to the patron membership interests collectively and the nonpatron membership interests individually to the extent the contributions have been accepted by the cooperative. Distributions of cash or other assets of the cooperative shall be allocated among the membership interests as provided in the articles and bylaws, subject to this chapter. If not otherwise provided, distributions shall be made on the basis of value of the capital contributions of the patron membership interests collectively and the nonpatron membership interests to the extent the contributions have been accepted by the cooperative.

The bylaws may provide that the cooperative or the patron members, individually or collectively, have the first privilege of purchasing the membership interests of any class of membership interests offered for sale. The first privilege to purchase membership interests may be satisfied by notice to other members that the membership interests are for sale and a procedure by which members may proceed to attempt to purchase and acquire the membership interests. A membership interest acquired by the cooperative may be held to be reissued or may be retired and cancelled.

Subject to the provisions in the bylaws, a member may dissent from and obtain payment for the fair value of the member's nonpatron membership interests in the cooperative if the articles or bylaws are amended in a manner that materially and adversely affects the rights and preferences of the nonpatron membership interests of the dissenting member. The dissenting member shall file a notice of intent to demand fair value of the membership interest with the records officer of the cooperative within thirty (30) days after the amendment of the bylaws and notice of the amendment to members; otherwise, the right of the dissenting member to demand payment of fair value for the membership interest is deemed to be waived. If a proposed amendment of the articles or bylaws shall be approved by the members, a member who is entitled to dissent and who wishes to exercise dissenter's rights shall file a notice to demand fair value of the membership interest with the records officer of the cooperative before the vote on the proposed action and shall not vote in favor of the proposed action; otherwise, the right to demand fair value for the membership interest by the dissenting member is deemed waived. After receipt of the dissenting member's demand notice and approval of the amendment, the cooperative has sixty (60) days to rescind the amendment or otherwise the cooperative shall remit the fair value for the one (1) member's interest to the dissenting member by one hundred eighty (180) days after receipt of the notice. Upon receipt of the fair value for the membership interest, the member has no further member rights in the cooperative.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 14.

43-38-502. Termination of membership.

A member always has the power to terminate membership by withdrawing at any time. Unless otherwise provided in this chapter, the articles or the bylaws, any other withdrawal or termination shall be deemed wrongful.

Unless otherwise provided in the articles, a member may not be expelled.

If, for any reason, the continued membership of a member is terminated:

If the existence and business of the cooperative is continued, then the member whose membership has terminated loses all governance rights and will be considered merely an assignee of the financial rights, owned before the termination of membership; or

Unless the articles or bylaws provide otherwise, if the existence and business of the cooperative is not continued, the member whose continued membership has terminated, except through wrongful withdrawal or wrongful termination, retains all governance rights owned before the termination of the membership and may exercise those rights through the winding up and termination of the cooperative.

If a member withdraws in contravention of the articles or bylaws, then:

The member who has wrongfully withdrawn forfeits governance rights in the winding up and termination process or in the continued business; and

The member who has wrongfully withdrawn is liable to all the other members and to the cooperative to the extent damaged, including the loss of foregone profits, by the wrongful withdrawal. These damages may be offset against any amount to be paid to the wrongfully withdrawing or terminating by the cooperative.

If the business and existence of the cooperative are continued, any withdrawing or terminating member, whether the withdrawal or termination was wrongful or otherwise, is entitled to receive, subject to subsection (d), the lesser of the fair market value of the withdrawing or terminating member's interest determined on a going concern basis or the fair market value of the withdrawing member's interest determined on a liquidated basis.

Except as provided in subsection (d), if the business and existence of the cooperative are not continued, then any withdrawing or terminating member, whether the withdrawal or termination was wrongful or otherwise, is entitled to receive that member's distribution under § 43-38-1009.

Except as provided in the articles or bylaws, any amount to which a withdrawing or terminating member is entitled under subsection (e) or (f) shall be paid to the withdrawing or terminating member within six (6) months of the determination of the amount.

Notwithstanding other provisions in this section, the articles or bylaws may establish the amount to be paid a withdrawing or terminating member or a method for establishing the amount and may also establish the terms of payment of the amount. The established amount, or the method of determining the amount, and the established terms of payment shall control.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 15.

43-38-503. Assignment of member's financial rights.

Except as provided in subsection (c), a member's financial rights are transferable in whole or in part.

An assignment of a member's financial rights entitles the assignee to receive, to the extent assigned, only the share of profits and losses and the distributions to which the assignor would otherwise be entitled. An assignment of a member's financial rights does not dissolve the cooperative and does not entitle or empower the assignee to become a member, to cause a dissolution, to exercise any governance rights, or, except as specifically provided by this chapter, to receive any notices from the cooperative, or to cause dissolution. The assignment may not allow the assignee to control the member's exercise of governance rights, and any attempt to do so shall be void.

A restriction on the assignment of financial rights may be imposed in the articles, in the bylaws, by a written resolution adopted by the members, or by a written agreement among, or other written action by, members, or among them and the cooperative.

A restriction on the assignment of financial rights referenced in subdivision (c)(1) that is not manifestly unreasonable under the circumstances is enforceable against the owner of the restricted financial rights. A written restriction on the assignment of financial rights that is not manifestly unreasonable under the circumstances and is noted in the articles or bylaws may be enforced against a successor or transferee of the owner of the restricted financial rights, including a pledge or a legal representative, whether or not the successor or transferee of the owner had actual notice of the restriction. Unless noted in the articles or bylaws, a restriction, even though permitted by this section, is ineffective against a person without knowledge of the restriction.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 17.

43-38-504. Assignment of governance rights — Consequence of ineffective assignment.

A member may assign the member's full membership interest only by assigning all of the member's governance rights coupled with an assignment to the same assignee of all the member's financial rights. A member's governance rights are assignable only as provided in this section. A member or holder of a financial right has no power to assign all or any part of the member's membership interest or financial rights, except as provided in § 43-38-503 and this section.

Except as otherwise provided in the articles or the bylaws, a member may, without the consent of any other member, assign governance rights to another member.

Except as provided in subdivisions (b)(2)(B) and (b)(2)(C), any other assignment of any governance rights is effective only if all the directors, other than the director who is also a member seeking to make the assignment, approve the assignment by unanimous consent or otherwise if the articles or bylaws so permit. The consent may be evidenced in any manner specified in the articles or bylaws, but in the absence of specification, consent shall be evidenced by a written instrument, dated and signed by the person. The giving of consent is at the discretion of the consenting party and may be unreasonably withheld.

If the articles or bylaws so provide, the directors who are members may approve, by a majority or greater in number of the nonassigning directors who are members, the assignment of governance rights to a nonmember. In the event there are no nonassigning governors who are members, the assignment must be approved by unanimous consent of the governors, or, if the articles or bylaws so permit, the assignment shall be approved by at least a majority vote of the members, exclusive of the member seeking to make the assignment.

If permitted in the articles or bylaws, the governance rights associated with membership interests or classes of membership interests may be assigned without the consent of the members or the directors who are members.

When an assignment of governance rights is effective under subsection (b):

The assignee becomes a member, if not already a member; and

An assignee who has become a member has, to the extent assigned, the rights and powers and is subject to the restrictions and liabilities, of a member under the articles, any bylaws and this chapter.

When an assignment is effective under subsection (a):

The assignee is liable for any obligations of the assignor existing at the time of transfer, except to the extent that, at the time the assignee became a member, the liability was unknown to the assignee, and could not be ascertained from the required records of the cooperative;

Notwithstanding subdivision (d)(1), the assignee shall not be liable for the obligations of the assignor under § 43-38-904; and

The assignor is not released from liability to the cooperative for obligations of the assignor existing at the time of transfer, except as provided in subdivision (d)(1).

Unless otherwise provided in the articles or bylaws, the pledge or granting of a security interest, lien or other encumbrance in or against any or all of the membership interest of a member is not an assignment and shall not cause the member to cease to be a member or to cease to have the power to exercise any rights or powers of a member.

If any purported or attempted assignment of governance rights is ineffective for failure to obtain the consent required in subsection (b):

The purported or attempted assignment is ineffective in its entirety; and

Any assignment of financial rights that accompanied the purported or attempted assignment of governance rights is void.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 17.

43-38-505. Restrictions on assignment of governance rights.

In addition to restrictions set forth in this chapter, restrictions on the assignment of governance rights may be imposed in accordance with the procedures and under the same conditions as stated in § 43-38-503(c) for restricting the assignment of financial rights.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 17.

43-38-506. When assignment of financial and governance rights effective.

Any permissible assignment of financial rights under § 43-38-503 and of governance rights under § 43-38-504 will be effective as to and binding upon the cooperative only when the assignee's name, address, social security or taxpayer identification number and the nature and extent of the assignment are reflected in the required records of the cooperative.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 17.

43-38-507. Judgment creditors of members.

On application to a court of competent jurisdiction by any judgment creditor of a member, the court may charge the member's financial rights with payment of the unsatisfied amount of the judgment with interest. To the extent so charged, the judgment creditor has only the rights of an assignee of the member's financial rights under § 43-38-503. This section does not deprive any member or assignee of financial rights of the benefit of any exemption laws applicable to the membership interest. This section is the sole and exclusive remedy of a judgment creditor with respect to the judgment debtor's membership interest.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 17.

43-38-508. Death, incompetence, or bankruptcy of member — Member that is dissolved, terminated, or in receivership.

If a member who is an individual dies, a court of competent jurisdiction adjudges the member to be incompetent to manage the member's person or property, or the court places the individual in bankruptcy, the member's executor, administrator, guardian, conservator, trustee, or other legal representative, except as otherwise provided in the articles or bylaws, may exercise all of the member's rights, except voting rights, for the purpose of settling the estate or administering the member's property. If a member is a cooperative, trust, or other entity and is dissolved, terminated, or placed by a court in receivership or bankruptcy, the powers of that member, except as otherwise provided in the articles or bylaws, may be exercised by its legal representative or successor, except the interest shall be a non-voting interest.

If an event referred to in subsection (a) causes the termination of a member's interest, then:

As provided in § 43-38-502(c), the terminated member's interest will be considered to be merely that of an assignee of the financial rights owned before the termination of membership; and

The rights to be exercised by the legal representative of the successor will be limited accordingly.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 18.

43-38-509. Contribution agreements or contribution allowance agreements — Preemptive rights.

Unless otherwise specifically provided in the articles or bylaws, members or parties, other than the cooperative, to a contribution agreement or a contribution allowance agreement shall not have preemptive rights. If the articles or bylaws provide for the possibility of preemptive rights, these rights shall be granted on the terms and conditions prescribed in the articles or bylaws to provide a fair and reasonable opportunity to exercise the rights to acquire additional proportional interests.

A preemptive right is the right of a member to make contributions of a certain amount or to make a contribution allowance agreement specifying future contributions of a certain amount before the cooperative may accept new contributions from other persons or to make contribution allowance agreements with other persons.

No preemptive rights arise as to contributions to be accepted from others or as to contribution allowance agreements to be made with others when the contribution is to be made:

In a form other than money;

Reflected pursuant to a plan of merger or exchange;

Reflected pursuant to an employee or incentive benefit plan approved at a meeting by the affirmative vote of the owners of a majority of the voting power of all membership interests entitled to vote;

Pursuant to a previously made contribution allowance agreement; or

Reflected pursuant to a plan of reorganization approved by a court of competent jurisdiction pursuant to a statute of this state or of the United States.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 19.

43-38-510. Annual members' meetings.

Regular members' meetings shall be held annually at a time determined by the board, unless otherwise provided for in the bylaws.

The regular members' meeting shall be held at the principal place of business of the cooperative or at another conveniently located place as determined by the bylaws or the board.

The officers shall submit reports to the members at the regular members' meeting covering the business of the cooperative for the previous fiscal year that show the condition of the cooperative at the close of the fiscal year.

All directors shall be elected at the regular members' meeting for the terms of office prescribed in the bylaws, except for directors elected at district or unit meetings.

The cooperative shall give notice of regular members' meetings by mailing the regular members' meeting notice to each member at the member's last known post office address or by other notification approved by the board and agreed to by the members. The notice must contain the date, time, and place of the meeting, and any other information required by this section. The regular members' meeting notice shall be published or otherwise given by approved method at least two (2) weeks before the date of the meeting or mailed at least fifteen (15) days before the date of the meeting.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 20.

43-38-511. Special members' meetings.

Special members' meetings of the members may be called by:

A majority vote of the board; or

The written petition of at least twenty percent (20%) of the patron members, twenty percent (20%) of the nonpatron members or twenty percent (20%) of all members collectively, submitted to the chair.

The cooperative shall give notice of a special members' meeting by mailing the special members' meeting notice to each member personally at the person's last known post office address or an alternative method approved by the board and the member individually or the members generally. For a member that is an entity, notice mailed or delivered by an alternative method shall be to an officer of the entity. The special members' meeting notice shall state the time, place, and purpose of the special members' meeting. The special members' meeting notice shall be issued within ten (10) days from and after the date of the presentation of a members' petition, and the special members' meeting shall be held within thirty (30) days after the date of the presentation of the members' petition.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 20.

43-38-512. Notice of meetings.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter or in the articles, written notice to all meetings of members must be given to every member entitled to vote on the matters to be considered, unless:

The meeting is an adjourned meeting and the date, time, and place of the meeting were announced at the time of adjournment; or

The following have been mailed by first class, certified or registered mail to a member at the address in the cooperative records and returned undeliverable:

Two (2) consecutive meeting notices; and

All payments of distributions for the greater of a twelve-month period or two (2) distributions.

An action or meeting that is taken or held without notice under subdivision (a)(1)(B) has the same force and effect as if notice was given. If the member delivers a written notice of the member's current address to the cooperative, the notice requirement is reinstated.

Unless otherwise provided in the articles or bylaws, the record date for the determination of the owners of membership interests entitled to notice of and to vote at any meeting of members is the close of business and the date before the first notice is sent to the members.

The notice must contain the date, time and place of the meeting, and any other information required by this chapter. In the case of a meeting, other than the required annual meeting of the board of directors, the notice must contain a statement of the purposes of the meeting. The notice may also contain any other information required by the articles or bylaws or considered necessary or desirable by the person or persons calling the meeting.

A certificate of the secretary or other person giving notice that the notice required by this section has been given, in the absence of fraud, shall be prima facie evidence of the facts stated therein.

Notwithstanding provisions in the articles or bylaws to the contrary, all members and parties to contribution agreements or contribution allowance agreements, or both, shall be entitled to receive notices of the annual meetings of the members of a board-managed cooperative and notices of all meetings of a cooperative called for the purpose of considering any of the following actions:

Dissolution;

Liquidation;

Sale of all or substantially all of the assets of the cooperative outside the ordinary course of business; or

Merger.

The failure of the cooperative to properly notify the parties not entitled to vote on a matter shall not invalidate or void any action described in this section taken at the meeting.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 20.

Cross-References. Certified mail instead of registered mail, § 1-3-111.

43-38-513. Certificate and statement of notice.

After mailing special or regular members' meeting notices or otherwise delivering the notices, the cooperative shall execute a certificate containing the date of mailing or delivery of the notice and a statement that the special or regular members' meeting notices were mailed or delivered as prescribed by law.

The certificate shall be made a part of the record of the meeting.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 20.

43-38-514. Failure to receive notice.

Failure of a member to receive a special or regular members' meeting notice does not invalidate an action that is taken by the members at a members' meeting.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 20.

43-38-515. Waiver of notice.

A member may waive any notice required by this section. Except as otherwise provided in this section, a waiver of notice by a member entitled to notice is effective, whether given before or after the meeting or other balloting, if notice is given in writing, signed by the member entitled to the notice, and filed with the minutes or corporate records.

A member's attendance at or participation in a meeting waives any required notice to the member of the meeting, unless the member, at the beginning of the meeting or promptly upon the member's arrival, objects to holding the meeting or transacting business at the meeting and does not thereafter vote for or assent to action taken at the meeting. The secretary is required to note the objection in the minutes of the meeting.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 20.

43-38-516. Action without a meeting on written consent.

Unless the articles provide otherwise, any action required or permitted to be taken at a meeting of the members may be taken without a meeting by action on written consent as provided in § 43-38-517 or on recommendation of the board of directors as provided in § 43-38-518. Any action taken pursuant to § 43-38-517 or § 43-38-518 has the effect of a meeting and vote and may be described as such in any document. Any requirement in this chapter for action at a meeting will be satisfied by an action taken in accordance with § 43-38-517 or § 43-38-518.

If this chapter, the articles or bylaws require that notice of proposed action be given to members and the action is to be taken by members pursuant to § 43-38-517 or § 43-38-518, then the cooperative must give its members who would not be entitled to vote on the matter a written notice of the proposed action at least ten (10) days before action is taken on written consent or at the same time notice is given to the members entitled to vote under § 43-38-518. The notice must contain or be accompanied by the same material that would have been required to be sent to members in a notice of meeting at which the proposed action would have been submitted to the members for action.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 21.

43-38-517. Procedure for taking action without a meeting on written consent.

To take action on written consent:

A written waiver of acting at a meeting must be signed by all members, or a smaller number or percentage interest as provided for in the articles or bylaws, but not less than a majority in voting power; and

A written consent must be signed by members who own membership interests with voting power equal to the voting power that would be required to take the same action at a meeting of the members at which all members are present.

The action must be evidenced by one (1) or more instruments evidencing the waiver and consent, which shall be delivered to the secretary for inclusion in the records of the cooperative. All such instruments may be signed in counterparts.

If not otherwise determined under § 43-38-526, the record date for determining members entitled to take action without a meeting is the date the first member signs the consent under subsection (a).

Unless otherwise provided in the articles or the bylaws, the action on written consent is effective when the last required member signs the waiver and written consent, unless a different effective time is provided in the instrument evidencing the written consent itself.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 21.

43-38-518. Proposal to take action without a meeting — Notice — Procedure for calling a meeting.

Except with respect to dissolution, liquidation or merger, the board of directors may, acting on the board's initiative, make a proposal to the members to take an action without a meeting. All members entitled to vote shall be given written notice of the proposal. The notice shall require a written response within a specified time, but not less than thirty (30) days from the effective date of the notice and shall contain the recommendation of the board of directors. The failure of a member to respond within the time specified in the notice shall constitute a vote in favor of the recommendation of the board of directors, as the case may be. The notice shall contain a statement concerning the voting effect of the failure of a member to timely respond to the proposal. Except as provided in subsection (b), if the voting power of the members responding in favor of the recommendation as to the proposal, combined with the voting power of the members failing to respond, is equal to the voting power that would be required to take the same action at a meeting of the members at which all members are present, then the proposal shall become the action of the members of the cooperative effective as of the expiration of the notice period.

Notwithstanding subsection (a), if members with twenty percent (20%) of the aggregate voting power of the cooperative or the class, series, or group of the members entitled to vote on the specific matter notify the secretary in writing within fifteen (15) days of the giving of the notice that a meeting should be called to consider one (1) or more of the matters on which the board of directors has made recommendation, the vote may not be taken as provided in this section, but a meeting of the members shall be called to consider and to take action on the matter.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 21.

43-38-519. Quorum requirements.

The quorum for a members' meeting to transact business shall be:

Ten percent (10%) of the total number of members for a cooperative with five hundred (500) or fewer members; or

Fifty (50) members for cooperatives with more than five hundred (500) members.

In determining a quorum at a meeting, on a question submitted to a vote by mail or an alternative method, members present in person or represented by mail vote or the alternative voting method shall be counted. The attendance of a sufficient number of members to constitute a quorum shall be established by a registration of the members of the cooperative present at the meeting. The registration shall be verified by the chair or the records officer of the cooperative and shall be reported in the minutes of the meeting.

An action by a cooperative is not valid or legal in the absence of a quorum at the meeting at which the action was taken.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 22.

43-38-520. Action of members after vote — Class or series of memberships.

The members shall take action by the affirmative vote of the owners of the greater of:

A majority of the voting power of the membership interests present and entitled to vote on that item of business in a meeting in which a quorum is present; or

A majority of the voting power that would constitute a quorum for the transaction of business at the meeting, except where this chapter, the articles of organization, or a member control agreement, requires a larger proportion. If the articles, bylaws, or a member control agreement requires a larger proportion than is required by this chapter for a particular action, the articles, bylaws, or the member control agreement controls.

In any case where a class or series of membership interests is entitled to vote as a class or series by this chapter, the articles of organization, bylaws, a member control agreement, or the terms of the membership interests, the matter being voted upon must also receive the affirmative vote of the owners of the same proportion of the membership interests present of that class or series; or of the total outstanding membership interests of that class or series, as the proportion required pursuant to subsection (a), unless the articles, bylaws, or the member control agreement require a larger proportion. Unless otherwise stated in the articles, bylaws, or a member control agreement, in the case of voting as a class or series, the minimum percentage of the total voting power of membership interests of the class or series that must be present is equal to the minimum percentage of all membership interests entitled to vote required to be present under § 43-38-516.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 22.

43-38-521. Proxy voting prohibited.

Voting shall not be by proxy, except as provided in § 43-38-522(d).

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 22.

43-38-522. Number of votes allowed — Time for voting — Method of voting — Members represented by delegates — Absentee ballots.

A patron member of a cooperative is only entitled to one (1) vote on an issue to be voted upon by members holding patron membership interests, except that a patron member of a cooperative described in § 43-38-523 may be entitled to more than one (1) vote as provided in that section. On any matter of the cooperative, the entire patron members voting power shall be voted collectively based upon the vote of the majority of patron members' voting on the issue. A nonpatron member has the voting rights in accordance to the nonpatron membership interests as granted in the bylaws, subject to this chapter.

A member or delegate may exercise voting rights on any matter that is before the members as prescribed in the articles or bylaws at a members' meeting from the time the member or delegate arrives at the members' meeting, unless the articles or bylaws specify an earlier and specific time for closing the right to vote.

A member's vote at a members' meeting shall be in person or by mail if a mail vote is authorized by the board or by alternative method if authorized by the board, and not by proxy, except as provided in subsection (d).

The following shall apply to members represented by delegates:

A cooperative may provide in the articles or bylaws that units or districts of members are entitled to be represented at members' meetings by delegates chosen by the members of the unit or district. The delegates may vote on matters at the members' meeting in the same manner as a member. The delegates may only exercise the voting rights on a basis and with the number of votes as prescribed in the articles or bylaws;

If the approval of a certain portion of the members is required for adoption of amendments, dissolution, merger, consolidation, or the sale of assets, the votes of delegates shall be counted as votes by the members represented by the delegate;

Patron members may be represented by the proxy of other patron members; and

Nonpatron members may be represented by proxy if authorized in the bylaws.

The following shall apply to absentee ballots:

A member who is or will be absent from a members' meeting may vote by mail or by an approved alternative method on the ballot prescribed in this subsection (e) on any motion, resolution or amendment that the board submits for vote by mail or alternative method to the members;

The ballot shall be in the form prescribed by the board and contain:

The exact text of the proposed motion, resolution or amendment to be acted on at the meeting; and

The text of the motion, resolution or amendment for which the member may indicate an affirmative or negative vote;

The member shall express a choice by marking an appropriate choice on the ballot and mail, deliver or otherwise submit the ballot to the cooperative in a plain, sealed envelope inside another envelope bearing the member's name or by an alternative method approved by the board; and

A properly executed ballot shall be accepted by the board and counted as the vote of the absent member at the meeting.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 22.

43-38-523. Voting for cooperative constituted of other cooperatives or associations — Cooperative organized into units or districts of patron members.

A cooperative that is constituted entirely or partially of other cooperatives or associations may authorize by the articles or the bylaws for affiliated cooperative patron members to have an additional vote for:

A stipulated amount of business transacted between the patron member cooperative and the central cooperative organization;

A stipulated number of patron members in the member cooperative;

A certain stipulated amount of equity allocated to or held by the patron member cooperative in the cooperative central organization; or

A combination of methods in subdivisions (a)(1) through (a)(3).

A cooperative that is organized into units or districts of patron members, may, by the articles or the bylaws, authorize the delegates elected by its patron members or have an additional vote for:

A stipulated amount of business transacted between the patron members in the units or districts and the cooperative;

A certain stipulated amount of equity allocated to or held by the patron members of the units or districts of the cooperative; or

A combination of methods in subdivisions (b)(1) and (b)(2).

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 22.